xapian-core/languages/algorithms/norwegian.sbl
// Alias: nb nn no
// Snowball's "Norwegian" stemmer works for both nb and nn
// according to AlexB on #xapian.

routines (
           mark_regions
           main_suffix
           consonant_pair
           other_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 )

groupings ( v s_ending )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef ae   '{U+00E6}'
stringdef ao   '{U+00E5}'
stringdef e^   '{U+00EA}'  // e-circumflex
stringdef o`   '{U+00F2}'  // o-grave
stringdef o'   '{U+00F3}'  // o-acute
stringdef o^   '{U+00F4}'  // o-circumflex
stringdef o/   '{U+00F8}'

define v 'ae{e^}io{o`}{o'}{o^}uy{ae}{ao}{o/}'

define s_ending  'bcdfghjlmnoptvyz'

define mark_regions as (
    $p1 = limit

    do (
      (
        // If there's an apostrophe, start R1 after it to handle
        // acronym loanwords such as "pc'en" and "ep'en".
        gopast '{'}'
      ) or (
        gopast v  gopast non-v
      )
      setmark p1
    )

    // Ensure at least 3 characters before R1.
    test (hop 3  do ($p1 < cursor  $p1 = cursor))
)

backwardmode (

    define main_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(

            'a' 'e' 'ede' 'ande' 'ende' 'ane' 'ene' 'hetene' 'en' 'heten' 'ar'
            'er' 'heter' 'as' 'es' 'edes' 'endes' 'enes' 'hetenes' 'ens'
            'hetens' 'ets' 'et' 'het' 'ast'
                (delete)
            'ers'
                (
                  among (
                    'amm' 'ast' 'ind' 'kap' 'kk' 'lt' 'nk' 'omm' 'pp' 'v'
                    '{o/}st'
                        ()
                    'giv' 'hav' 'skap' ''
                        (delete)
                  )
                )
            's'
                (s_ending or ('r' not 'e') or ('k' non-v) delete)
            'erte' 'ert'
                (<-'er')
        )
    )

    define consonant_pair as (
        test (
            setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
            among(
                'dt' 'vt'
            )
        )
        next] delete
    )

    define other_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'leg' 'eleg' 'ig' 'eig' 'lig' 'elig' 'els' 'lov' 'elov' 'slov'
            'hetslov'
                (delete)
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    mark_regions
    backwards (
        do main_suffix
        do consonant_pair
        do other_suffix
        // Remove trailing apostrophe.
        ['{'}'] delete
    )
)
